Illinois, session 104th, HB3690.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Sections 21-205 and 21-355 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/21-205)7    Sec. 21-205. Tax sale procedures. 8    (a) The collector, in person or by deputy, shall attend, 9on the day and in the place specified in the notice for the 10sale of property for taxes, and shall, between 9:00 a.m. and 114:00 p.m., or later at the collector's discretion, proceed to 12offer for sale, separately and in consecutive order, all 13property in the list on which the taxes, special assessments, 14interest or costs have not been paid. However, in any county 15with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the offer for sale shall 16be made between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m. The collector's office 17shall be kept open during all hours in which the sale is in 18progress. The sale shall be continued from day to day, until 19all property in the delinquent list has been offered for sale. 20However, any city, village or incorporated town interested in 21the collection of any tax or special assessment, may, in 22default of bidders, withdraw from collection the special 23assessment levied against any property by the corporate   HB3690- 2 -LRB104 10918 HLH 22328 b1authorities of the city, village or incorporated town. In case 2of a withdrawal, there shall be no sale of that property on 3account of the delinquent special assessment thereon.4    (b) For Until January 1, 2013, in every sale of property 5pursuant to the provisions of this Code, the collector may 6employ any automated means that the collector deems 7appropriate. Beginning on January 1, 2013, either (i) the 8collector shall employ an automated bidding system that is 9programmed to accept the winning bidder at random the lowest 10redemption price bid by an eligible tax purchaser, subject to 11the penalty percentage limitation set forth in Section 21-215, 12or (ii) all tax sales shall be digitally recorded with video 13and audio. All bidders are required to personally attend the 14sale and, if automated means are used, all hardware and 15software used with respect to those automated means must be 16certified by the Department and re-certified by the Department 17every 5 years. If the tax sales are digitally recorded and no 18automated bidding system is used, then the recordings shall be 19maintained by the collector for a period of at least 3 years 20from the date of the tax sale. The changes made by this 21amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly are declarative of 22existing law. 23    (b-5) Each For any annual tax sale conducted on or after 24the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 25Assembly, each county collector in a county with 100,000 26275,000 or more inhabitants shall adopt a single bidder rule   HB3690- 3 -LRB104 10918 HLH 22328 b1sufficient to prohibit a tax purchaser from registering more 2than one related bidding entity at the tax sale. The corporate 3authorities in any county with less than 100,000 275,000 4inhabitants may, by ordinance, allow the county collector of 5that county to adopt such a single bidder rule. In any county 6that has adopted a single bidder rule under this subsection 7(b-5), the county treasurer shall include a representation and 8warranty form in each registration package attesting to 9compliance with the single bidder rule, except that the county 10may, by ordinance, opt out of this representation and warranty 11form requirement. A single bidder rule under this subsection 12may be in the following form: 13        (1) A registered tax buying entity (principal) may 14    only have one registered buyer at the tax sale and may not 15    have a related bidding entity directly or indirectly 16    register as a buyer or participate in the tax sale. A 17    registered tax buying entity may not engage in any 18    multiple bidding strategy for the purpose of having more 19    than one related bidding entity submit bids at the tax 20    sale. 21        (2) A related bidding entity is defined as any 22    individual, corporation, partnership, joint venture, 23    limited liability company, business organization, or other 24    entity that has a shareholder, partner, principal, 25    officer, general partner, or other person or entity having 26    (i) an ownership interest in a bidding entity in common   HB3690- 4 -LRB104 10918 HLH 22328 b1    with any other registered participant in the tax sale or 2    (ii) a common guarantor in connection with a source of 3    financing with any other registered participant in the tax 4    sale. The determination of whether registered entities are 5    related so as to prohibit those entities from submitting 6    duplicate bids in violation of the single bidder rule is 7    at the sole and exclusive discretion of the county 8    treasurer or his or her designated representatives. 9    (c) County collectors may, when applicable, eject tax 10bidders who disrupt the tax sale or use illegal bid practices. 11(Source: P.A. 102-519, eff. 8-20-21.) 12    (35 ILCS 200/21-355)13    Sec. 21-355. Amount of redemption. Any person desiring to 14redeem shall deposit an amount specified in this Section with 15the county clerk of the county in which the property is 16situated, in legal money of the United States, or by cashier's 17check, certified check, post office money order or money order 18issued by a financial institution insured by an agency or 19instrumentality of the United States, payable to the county 20clerk of the proper county. The deposit shall be deemed timely 21only if actually received in person at the county clerk's 22office prior to the close of business as defined in Section 233-2007 of the Counties Code on or before the expiration of the 24period of redemption or by United States mail with a post 25office cancellation mark dated not less than one day prior to   HB3690- 5 -LRB104 10918 HLH 22328 b1the expiration of the period of redemption. The deposit shall 2be in an amount equal to the total of the following:3        (a) the certificate amount, which shall include all 4    tax principal, special assessments, interest and penalties 5    paid by the tax purchaser together with costs and fees of 6    sale and fees paid under Sections 21-295 and 21-315 7    through 21-335, except for the nonrefundable $80 fee paid, 8    pursuant to Section 21-295, for each item purchased at the 9    tax sale;10        (b) the accrued penalty, computed through the date of 11    redemption as a percentage of the certificate amount, as 12    follows:13            (1) for tax certificates sold after January 1, 14        2026 in counties with more than 3,000,000 inhabitants, 15        a penalty of 0.75% per month or portion thereof; if the 16        redemption occurs on or before the expiration of 6 17        months from the date of sale, the certificate amount 18        times the penalty bid at sale;19            (2) for tax certificates sold after January 1, 20        2026 in counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, 21        a penalty of 1.        5% per month or portion thereof; if the 22        redemption occurs after 6 months from the date of 23        sale, and on or before the expiration of 12 months from 24        the date of sale, the certificate amount times 2 times 25        the penalty bid at sale;26            (3) (blank); if the redemption occurs after 12   HB3690- 6 -LRB104 10918 HLH 22328 b1        months from the date of sale and on or before the 2        expiration of 18 months from the date of sale, the 3        certificate amount times 3 times the penalty bid at 4        sale;5            (4) (blank); if the redemption occurs after 18 6        months from the date of sale and on or before the 7        expiration of 24 months from the date of sale, the 8        certificate amount times 4 times the penalty bid at 9        sale;10            (5) (blank); or if the redemption occurs after 24 11        months from the date of sale and on or before the 12        expiration of 30 months from the date of sale, the 13        certificate amount times 5 times the penalty bid at 14        sale;15            (6) (blank). if the redemption occurs after 30 16        months from the date of sale and on or before the 17        expiration of 36 months from the date of sale, the 18        certificate amount times 6 times the penalty bid at 19        sale.20        In the event that the property to be redeemed has been 21    purchased under Section 21-405 before January 1, 2024, the 22    penalty bid shall be 12% per penalty period as set forth in 23    subparagraphs (1) through (6) of this subsection (b). The 24    changes to this subdivision (b)(6) made by this amendatory 25    Act of the 91st General Assembly are not a new enactment, 26    but declaratory of existing law.  HB3690- 7 -LRB104 10918 HLH 22328 b1        For counties with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if 2    the property to be redeemed is property with respect to 3    which a tax lien or certificate is acquired after January 4    1, 2026 2024 by the county as trustee pursuant to Section 5    21-90, the penalty bid at sale shall accrue according to 6    the penalty periods established in subparagraph (1) 7    subparagraphs (1) through (6) of this subsection (b). 8        For counties with more than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if 9    the property to be redeemed is property with respect to 10    which a tax lien or certificate is acquired on or after 11    January 1, 2026 2024 by the county as trustee pursuant to 12    Section 21-90, the penalty bid is 1.25% 0.75% and shall 13    accrue monthly instead of according to the penalty periods 14    established in subparagraphs (1) through (6) of this 15    subsection (b). 16        (c) The total of all taxes, special assessments, 17    accrued interest on those taxes and special assessments 18    and costs charged in connection with the payment of those 19    taxes or special assessments, except for the nonrefundable 20    $80 fee paid, pursuant to Section 21-295, for each item 21    purchased at the tax sale, which have been paid by the tax 22    certificate holder on or after the date those taxes or 23    special assessments became delinquent together with 12% 24    penalty on each amount so paid for each year or portion 25    thereof intervening between the date of that payment and 26    the date of redemption. In counties with less than   HB3690- 8 -LRB104 10918 HLH 22328 b1    3,000,000 inhabitants, however, a tax certificate holder 2    may not pay all or part of an installment of a subsequent 3    tax or special assessment for any year, nor shall any 4    tender of such a payment be accepted, until after the 5    second or final installment of the subsequent tax or 6    special assessment has become delinquent or until after 7    the holder of the certificate of purchase has filed a 8    petition for a tax deed under Section 22.30. The person 9    redeeming shall also pay the amount of interest charged on 10    the subsequent tax or special assessment and paid as a 11    penalty by the tax certificate holder. This amendatory Act 12    of 1995 applies to tax years beginning with the 1995 13    taxes, payable in 1996, and thereafter.14        (d) Any amount paid to redeem a forfeiture occurring 15    before January 1, 2024 but after the tax sale together 16    with 12% penalty thereon for each year or portion thereof 17    intervening between the date of the forfeiture redemption 18    and the date of redemption from the sale.19        (e) Any amount paid by the certificate holder for 20    redemption of a subsequently occurring tax sale, including 21    tax liens or certificates held by the county as trustee, 22    pursuant to Section 21-90.23        (f) All fees paid to the county clerk under Section 24    22-5.25        (g) All fees paid to the registrar of titles incident 26    to registering the tax certificate in compliance with the   HB3690- 9 -LRB104 10918 HLH 22328 b1    Registered Titles (Torrens) Act.2        (h) All fees paid to the circuit clerk and the 3    sheriff, a licensed or registered private detective, or 4    the coroner in connection with the filing of the petition 5    for tax deed and service of notices under Sections 22-15 6    through 22-30 and 22-40 in addition to (1) a fee of $350 7    $35 if a petition for tax deed has been filed, which fee 8    shall be posted to the tax judgement, sale, redemption, 9    and forfeiture record, to be paid to the purchaser or his 10    or her assignee; (2) a fee of $40 $4 if a notice under 11    Section 22-5 has been filed, which fee shall be posted to 12    the tax judgment, sale, redemption, and forfeiture record, 13    to be paid to the purchaser or his or her assignee; (3) all 14    costs paid to record a lis pendens notice in connection 15    with filing a petition under this Code; and (4) if a 16    petition for tax deed has been filed, all fees up to $150 17    per redemption paid to a registered or licensed title 18    insurance company or title insurance agent for a title 19    search to identify all owners, parties interested, and 20    occupants of the property, to be paid to the purchaser or 21    his or her assignee. The fees in (1) and (2) of this 22    paragraph (h) shall be exempt from the posting 23    requirements of Section 21-360. The costs incurred in 24    causing notices to be served by a licensed or registered 25    private detective under Section 22-15, may not exceed the 26    amount that the sheriff would be authorized by law to   HB3690- 10 -LRB104 10918 HLH 22328 b1    charge if those notices had been served by the sheriff.2        (i) All fees paid for publication of notice of the tax 3    sale in accordance with Section 22-20.4        (j) All sums paid to any county, city, village or 5    incorporated town for reimbursement under Section 22-35.6        (k) All costs and expenses of receivership under 7    Section 21-410, to the extent that these costs and 8    expenses exceed any income from the property in question, 9    if the costs and expenditures have been approved by the 10    court appointing the receiver and a certified copy of the 11    order or approval is filed and posted by the certificate 12    holder with the county clerk. Only actual costs expended 13    may be posted on the tax judgment, sale, redemption and 14    forfeiture record.15(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24.)